California statutes. Education Code
(b) Every certificated employee, who has completed service as a district intern pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 44325 and pursuant to Section 44830.3 and who is further reelected and employed during the succeeding school year as described in subdivision (a) shall, upon reelection for the next succeeding school year, to a position requiring certification qualifications, be classified as and become a permanent employee of the district.

The governing board shall notify the employee, on or before March 15 of the employee’s last complete consecutive school year of probationary employment in a position requiring certification qualification as described in this subdivision, of the decision to reelect or not reelect the employee for the next succeeding school year to this type of a position. In the event the governing board does not give notice pursuant to this section on or before March 15, the employee shall be deemed reelected for the next succeeding school year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1468, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

44893.

A permanent employee when advanced from a teaching position to an administrative or supervisory position, or assigned any special or other type of work, or given special classification or designation requiring certification qualifications, shall retain his permanent classification as a classroom teacher.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44894.

(a) A permanent employee not qualified to render service as a classroom teacher, when advanced to an administrative or supervisory position, or assigned any special or other type of work, or given special classification or designation requiring certification qualifications, shall retain his permanent classification for the performance of the type of service for which he was qualified prior to such advancement, assignment, or special classification or designation.

(b) If an employee is authorized to render service in more than one type of position for which certification qualifications are required, either by virtue of his possession of one certification document authorizing service in two or more of such positions, or by virtue of his possession of separate certification documents authorizing service in two or more such positions, or any combination thereof, he shall, upon satisfying all other requirements prescribed by law, acquire permanent status as follows:

(1) If he is authorized to render service as a classroom teacher, he shall acquire permanent status as a classroom teacher.

(2) If he is not authorized to render service as a classroom teacher, he shall acquire permanent status below the administrative or supervisory level as a staff employee with multiple qualifications. His right to serve in one or more of the positions for which he is qualified to serve shall be subject to the power of assignment of the school district governing board.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44895.

A permanent employee, as specified in Section 44894, when advanced to an administrative or supervisory position requiring certification qualifications, or assigned any special or other type of work requiring certification qualifications, or given special classification or designation requiring certification qualifications, shall retain his permanent classification as specified in Section 44894.

If such a person is advanced to an administrative or supervisory position not requiring certification qualifications, is assigned any special or other type of work not requiring certification qualifications, or is given special classification or designation not requiring certification qualifications, his right to retain permanent classification shall be governed by the provisions of Article 3 (commencing with Section 44060) of Chapter 1 of this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 909.)
-------------------------------------------

44896.

Whenever a person employed in an administrative or supervisory position requiring certification qualifications is transferred to a teaching position, the governing board of the school district shall give such employee, when requested by him, a written statement of the reasons for such transfer. If the reasons include incompetency, an evaluation of the person pursuant to Article 11 (commencing with Section 44660) of Chapter 3 of this part shall have been completed not more than 60 days prior to the giving of the notice of the transfer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 973.)
-------------------------------------------

44897.

(a) A person employed in an administrative or supervisory position requiring certification qualifications upon completing a probationary period, including any time served as a classroom teacher, in the same district, shall, in a district having an average daily attendance of 250 or more pupils, be classified as and become a permanent employee as a classroom teacher. In a district having an average daily attendance of less than 250 pupils, he or she may be so classified.

(b) Persons classified pursuant to this section are subject to the limitations contained in Section 44956.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1452, Sec. 377.)
-------------------------------------------

44898.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 44897 to the contrary, the governing board of any school district shall, with respect to each person who is employed in an administrative or supervisory position requiring certification qualifications under a contract of employment providing a four-year term of employment and who either has not been previously employed by the district in such position or has been employed in such position but not under such a four-year contract, determine prior to May 15 of the third year under such four-year contract of employment whether to grant or deny the person permanent classification as a classroom teacher. If it grants such classification, the person shall be classified as and become a permanent employee as a classroom teacher.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44899.

A person employed in an administrative or supervisory position by more than one district shall be given permanent classification in whichever district he may select for the permanent classification. Other permanent classification shall be given to such an employee in a district situated wholly or partly within a city or city and county where the charter of the city or city and county provides for other classification.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44900.

Any certificated employee having permanent classification in a district, who is granted a leave of absence and transfers to another district which is under the supervision of the same chief administrative officer or district superintendent as the district from which the employee is on leave, may acquire permanent classification in the district to which he transferred if he is employed for a second year in that district, at which time his permanent classification in the district from which he transferred shall expire.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44901.

(a) A certificated employee who has served in a position or positions requiring certification qualifications in two or more districts, each having an average daily attendance of 250 or more and governed by governing boards of identical personnel, for a total of three complete consecutive school years, upon being elected for the fourth consecutive school year to a position or positions requiring certification qualifications in any of the districts, shall at the commencement of the fourth consecutive school year be classified as a permanent employee of the last district in which he or she was employed prior to his or her election for the fourth consecutive school year.

Where there are two or more districts, each having an average daily attendance of 250 or more and governed by governing boards of identical personnel, a certificated employee who has served in one of the districts for three complete consecutive school years, upon being elected for the fourth consecutive school year to a position or positions requiring certification qualifications in any of the districts, shall at the commencement of the fourth consecutive school year be classified as and become a permanent employee of the last district in which he or she was employed prior to his or her election for the fourth consecutive school year.

This subdivision shall apply only to probationary employees whose probationary period commenced prior to the 1983–84 fiscal year.

(b) A certificated employee who has served in a position or positions requiring certification qualifications in two or more districts, each having an average daily attendance of 250 or more and governed by governing boards of identical personnel, for a total of two complete consecutive school years, upon being elected for the third consecutive school year to a position or positions requiring certification qualifications in any of the districts, shall at the commencement of the third consecutive school year be classified as a permanent employee of the last district in which he or she was employed prior to his or her election for the third consecutive school year.

Where there are two or more districts, each having an average daily attendance of 250 or more and governed by governing boards of identical personnel, a certificated employee who has served in one of the districts for two complete consecutive school years, upon being elected for the third consecutive school year to a position or positions requiring certification qualifications in any of the districts, shall at the commencement of the third consecutive school year be classified as and become a permanent employee of the last district in which he or she was employed prior to his or her election for the third consecutive school year.

The governing board shall notify the employee, on or before March 15 of the employee’s second complete consecutive school year of employment by the districts in a position or positions requiring certification qualifications, of the decision to reelect or not reelect the employee for the next succeeding school year to such a position. In the event that the governing board does not give notice pursuant to this section on or before March 15, the employee shall be deemed reelected for the next succeeding school year.

This subdivision shall apply only to probationary employees whose probationary period commenced during the 1983–84 fiscal year or any fiscal year thereafter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 498, Sec. 49.   Effective July 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

44902.1.

In a district which becomes unified, effective for all purposes on July 1, 1980, certificated employees employed for the school year 1980–81, who were employed for the school year 1979–80 by a union high school district included in the territory within the newly organized unified school district, may be placed on the salary schedule of the unified school district and be given credit for all service as an employee of the union high school district for years of experience as an employee of the union high school district. Their date of first paid service as a probationary employee may be the date established by the union high school district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 326, Sec. 1.   Effective July 5, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

44902.2.

In a school district which becomes unified, effective for all purposes, on July 1, 1980, certificated employees who are employed for the school year 1979–80 by a union high school district included in part in the territory within the newly organized unified school district shall be entitled to be employed by the unified district for the school year 1980–81 only if such employees were employed within the schools being acquired by the unified district. However, the unified school district may, but is not required to, employ additional employees of the union high school district to the extent the unified school district agrees to employ such employees.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 326, Sec. 2.   Effective July 5, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

44903.

On the unionization, unification, uniting, or consolidation of one or more school districts in which the average daily attendance for the preceding school year was less than 250 pupils, with a district or districts in which the average daily attendance was or, as a result of the unionization, uniting, consolidation, or unification, becomes 250 or more pupils, the regular three-year probationary period required of certificated employees for permanent status by Section 44882 shall be deemed to have commenced at the beginning of the employee’s first complete year of consecutive employment by the school district having an average daily attendance of less than 250 pupils. Every certificated employee who has been employed for three or more complete consecutive school years by a district having an average daily attendance of less than 250 pupils shall, immediately upon his employment in a certificated position following such unionization, unification, uniting, or consolidation, be a permanent employee. The amendments to this section enacted by the Legislature at the 1977–78 Regular Session shall apply only to the unionization, unification, uniting, or consolidation of school districts which becomes effective for all purposes on or after January 1, 1979.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1171.)
-------------------------------------------

44903.7.

When a local plan for the education of individuals with exceptional needs is developed or revised pursuant to Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 56195) of Part 30, the following provisions shall apply:

(a) Whenever any certificated employee, who is performing service for one employer, is terminated, reassigned, or transferred, or becomes an employee of another employer because of the reorganization of special education programs pursuant to Chapter 797 of the Statutes of 1980, the employee shall be entitled to the following:

(1) The employee shall retain the seniority date of his or her employment with the district or county office from which he or she was terminated, reassigned, or transferred, in accordance with Section 44847. In the case of termination, permanent employees shall retain the rights specified in Section 44956 or, in the case of probationary employees, Sections 44957 and 44958, with the district or county office initiating the termination pursuant to Section 44955.

(2) The reassignment, transfer, or new employment caused by the reorganization of special education programs pursuant to Chapter 797 of the Statutes of 1980, shall not affect the seniority or classification of certificated employees already attained in any school district that undergoes the reorganization. These employees shall have the same status with respect to their seniority or classification, with the new employer, including time served as probationary employees. The total number of years served as a certificated employee with the former district or county office shall be credited, year for year, for placement on the salary schedule of the new district or county office.

(b) All certificated employees providing service to individuals with exceptional needs shall be employed by a county office of education or an individual school district. Special education local plan areas or responsible local agencies resulting from local plans for the education of individuals with exceptional needs formulated in accordance with Part 30 (commencing with Section 56000) shall not be considered employers of certificated personnel for purposes of this section.

(c) Subsequent to the reassignment or transfer of any certificated employee as a result of the reorganization of special education programs, pursuant to Chapter 797 of the Statutes of 1980, that employee shall have priority, except as provided in subdivision (d), in being informed of and in filling certificated positions in special education in the areas in which the employee is certificated within the district or county office by which the certificated employee is then currently employed. This priority shall expire 24 months after the date of reassignment or transfer, and may be waived by the employee during that time period.

(d) A certificated employee who has served as a special education teacher in a district or county office and has been terminated from his or her employment by that district or county office pursuant to Section 44955, shall have first priority in being informed of and in filling vacant certificated positions in special education, for which the employee is certificated and was employed, in any other county office or school district that provides the same type of special education programs and services for the pupils previously served by the terminated employee. For a period of 39 months for permanent employees and 24 months for probationary employees from the date of termination, the employee shall have the first priority right to reappointment as provided in this section, if the employee has not attained the age of 65 years before reappointment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 854, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

44907.

The retirement of any employee of a school district under the provisions of any retirement law, except for employees retiring for disability under the Teachers’ Retirement Law, shall automatically effect the dismissal of the employee from the employ of the district at the end of the current school year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1165, Sec. 8.   Effective September 30, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

44908.

(a) (1) A probationary employee who, in any one school year, has served for at least 75 percent of the number of days the regular schools of the school district in which the employee is employed are maintained shall be deemed to have served a complete school year.

(2) In the case of adult education programs that are part of a school district maintaining kindergarten or any grades 1 to 12, inclusive, 75 percent of the number of hours constituting a full-time equivalent position for adult education programs in the school district, as described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 22138.5, shall be deemed a complete school year.

(b) To the extent that this section, as amended, repealed, and added by Assembly Bill
 897 of the 2023–24 Regular Session, conflicts with a provision of a collective bargaining agreement entered into by a public school employer and an exclusive bargaining representative before July 1, 2024, pursuant to Chapter 10.7 (commencing with Section 3540) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code, the changes made to this section by Assembly Bill 897 of the 2023–24 Regular Session shall not apply to the school district until expiration or renewal of that collective bargaining agreement.

(c) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2024.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 1) and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 548, Sec. 2.   (AB 897)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Operative July 1, 2024, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

44909.

(a) (1) The governing board of a school district may employ persons possessing an appropriate credential as certificated employees in programs and projects to perform services conducted under contract with public or private agencies, or categorically funded projects that are not required by federal or state statutes. The terms and conditions under which such persons are employed shall be mutually agreed upon by the employee and the governing board of the school district and the agreement shall be reduced to writing. The expected end date of employment, the source of funding, and the nature of the categorically funded program or project shall also be included in this writing.

(2) Service pursuant to this section shall not be included in computing the service required as a prerequisite to attainment of, or eligibility to, classification as a permanent employee unless (A) the person has served pursuant to this section for at least 75 percent of the number of days the regular schools of the school district by which the person is employed are maintained, and (B) the person is subsequently employed as a probationary employee in a position requiring certification qualifications. Such persons may be employed for periods that are less than a full school year and may be terminated at the expiration of the contract or specially funded project without regard to other requirements of this code respecting the termination of probationary or permanent employees other than Section 44918.

(b) Whenever a certificated employee in the regular educational program is assigned to a categorically funded project not required by federal or state statute and the school district employs an
 additional credentialed person to replace that certificated employee, the replacement certificated employee shall be subject to Section 44918.

(c) This section does not apply to a regularly credentialed employee who has been employed in the regular educational programs of the school district as a probationary employee before being subsequently assigned to any one of these programs.

(d) This section does not apply to a teacher of classes for adults.

(e) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2024.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 3) and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 548, Sec. 4.   (AB 897)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Operative July 1, 2024, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

44910.

(a) (1) Service by a person as an instructor in classes conducted at regional occupational centers or programs, as authorized pursuant to Section 52301, shall not be included in computing the service required as a prerequisite to attainment of, or eligibility for, classification as a permanent employee of a school district.

(2) This subdivision shall not be construed to apply to any regularly credentialed teacher who has been employed to teach in the regular educational programs of the school district and subsequently assigned as an instructor in regional occupational centers or programs, nor shall it affect the status of regional occupational center teachers classified as permanent or probationary at the time this section becomes effective.

(b) Notwithstanding the prohibition prescribed in subdivision (a), commencing July 1, 2025, service by a person as an instructor in classes conducted at a regional occupational center or program operated by a single school district, as authorized pursuant to Section 52301, shall be included in computing the service required as a prerequisite to attainment of, or eligibility for, classification as a permanent employee of a single school district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 956, Sec. 1.   (AB 2245)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

44911.

Service by a person under a provisional credential shall not be included in computing the service required as a prerequisite to attainment of, or eligibility to, classification as a permanent employee of a school district.

This section shall not be applicable to teachers granted a one-year emergency credential under the conditions specified in subdivision (b) of Section 44252 and subdivision (h) of Section 44830.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1388, Sec. 6.   Effective September 24, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

44912.

Service under a credential authorizing service only as a teacher of basic military drill in high school cadet companies established under Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Military and Veterans Code shall not be included in computing the service required as a prerequisite to attainment of, or eligibility to, classification as a permanent employee of a school district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44913.

Nothing in Sections 44882 to 44887, inclusive, Sections 44890, 44891, Sections 44893 to 44906, inclusive, and Sections 44908 to 44919, inclusive, shall be construed as permitting a certificated employee to acquire permanent classification with respect to employment in a summer school maintained by a school district, and service in connection with any such employment shall not be included in computing the service required as a prerequisite to attainment of, or eligibility to, classification as a permanent employee of the district. The provisions of this section do not constitute a change in, but are declaratory of, the preexisting law.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44914.

If an employee of a school district has served as a probationary employee of the district in a position requiring certification qualifications, for one complete school year, and in the year immediately preceding the service as probationary employee has served as a substitute employee, or as a substitute and probationary employee, serving in both capacities during the same school year in the schools of the district, at least 75 percent of the number of days the regular schools of the district were maintained, the governing board of the district may count the year of employment as a substitute or as a substitute and probationary employee as one year of the probationary period which he is required by law to serve as a condition to being classified as a permanent employee of the district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44915.

Governing boards of school districts shall classify as probationary employees, those persons employed in positions requiring certification qualifications for the school year, who have not been classified as permanent employees or as substitute employees.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44916.

The classification shall be made at the time of employment and thereafter in the month of July of each school year. At the time of initial employment during each academic year, each new certificated employee of the school district shall receive a written statement indicating his employment status and the salary that he is to be paid. If a school district hires a certificated person as a temporary employee, the written statement shall clearly indicate the temporary nature of the employment and the length of time for which the person is being employed. If a written statement does not indicate the temporary nature of the employment, the certificated employee shall be deemed to be a probationary employee of the school district, unless employed with permanent status.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44917.

Except as provided in Sections 44888 and 44920, governing boards of school districts shall classify as substitute employees those persons employed in positions requiring certification qualifications, to fill positions of regularly employed persons absent from service.

After September 1 of any school year, the governing board of any school district may employ, for the remainder of the school year, in substitute status any otherwise qualified person who consents to be employed in a position for which no regular employee is available, including persons retired for service under the State Teachers’ Retirement System. Inability to acquire the services of a qualified regular employee shall be demonstrated to the satisfaction of the Commission on Teacher Credentialing.

Any person employed for one complete school year as a temporary employee shall, if reemployed for the following school year in a position requiring certification qualifications, be classified by the governing board as a probationary employee and the previous year’s employment as a temporary employee shall be deemed one year’s employment as a probationary employee for purposes of acquiring permanent status.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 53, Sec. 13.   (SB 512)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

44918.

(a) Any employee classified as a substitute or temporary employee, who serves during one school year for at least 75 percent of the number of days the regular schools of the district were maintained in that school year and has performed the duties normally required of a certificated employee of the school district, shall be deemed to have served a complete school year as a probationary employee if employed as a probationary employee for the following school year.

(b) Any such employee shall be reemployed for the following school year to fill any vacant positions in the school district unless the employee has been released pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section
 44954.

(c) If an employee was released pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 44954 and has nevertheless been retained as a temporary or substitute employee by the district for two consecutive years and that employee has served for at least 75 percent of the number of days the regular schools of the district were maintained in each school year and has performed the duties normally required of a certificated employee of the school district, that employee shall receive first priority if the district fills a vacant position, at the grade level at which the employee served during either of the two years, for the subsequent school year. In the case of a departmentalized program, the employee shall have taught in the subject matter in which the vacant position occurs.

(d) Those
 employees classified as substitutes, and who are employed to serve in an on-call status to replace absent regular employees on a day-to-day basis shall not be entitled to the benefits of this section.

(e) Permanent and probationary employees subjected to a reduction in force pursuant to Section 44955 shall, during the period of preferred right to reappointment, have prior rights to any vacant position in which they are qualified to serve superior to those rights hereunder afforded to temporary and substitute personnel who have become probationary employees pursuant to this section.

(f) This section shall not apply to any school district in which the average daily attendance is in excess of 250,000.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 920, Sec. 5.   (SB 913)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

44919.

(a) Governing boards of school districts shall classify as temporary employees those persons requiring certification qualifications, other than substitute employees, who are employed to serve from day to day during the first three school months of any school term to teach temporary classes not to exist after the first three school months of any school term or to perform any other duties which do not last longer than the first three school months of any school term, or to teach in special day and evening classes for adults or in schools of migratory population for not more than four school months of any school term. If the classes or duties continue beyond the first three school months of any school term or four school months for special day and evening classes for adults, or schools for migratory population, the certificated employee, unless a permanent employee, shall be classified as a probationary employee. The school year may be divided into not more than two school terms for the purposes of this section.

(b) Governing boards shall classify as temporary employees persons, other than substitute employees, who are employed to serve in a limited assignment supervising athletic activities of pupils; provided, such assignment shall first be made available to teachers presently employed by the district. Service pursuant to this subdivision shall not be included in computing the service required as a prerequisite to attainment of, or eligibility to, classification as a permanent employee of a school district.

(c) In any district, the governing board may, to prevent the stoppage of school district business when an actual emergency arises and persons are not immediately available for probationary classification, make an appointment to a position on a temporary basis for a period not to exceed 20 working days. The person so appointed shall be deemed to be a temporary employee who is employed to serve from day to day. Service by a person in such an appointment on a temporary basis shall not be included in computing the service required as a prerequisite to attainment of, or eligibility to, classification as a permanent employee of a school district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 565.)
-------------------------------------------

44920.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Sections 44917 and 44919, the governing board of a school district may employ as a teacher, for a complete school year, but not less than one semester during a school year unless the date of rendering first paid service begins during the second semester and prior to March 15th, any person holding appropriate certification documents, and may classify such person as a temporary employee. The employment of such persons shall be based upon the need for additional certificated employees during a particular semester or year because a certificated employee has been granted leave for a semester or year, or is experiencing long-term illness, and shall be limited, in number of persons so employed, to that need, as determined by the governing board.

Any person employed for one complete school year as a temporary employee shall, if reemployed for the following school year in a vacant position requiring certification qualifications, be classified by the governing board as a probationary employee and the previous year’s employment as a temporary employee shall be deemed one year’s employment as a probationary employee for purposes of acquiring permanent status.

For purposes of this section “vacant position” means a position in which the employee is qualified to serve and which is not filled by a permanent or probationary employee. It shall not include a position which would be filled by a permanent or probationary employee except for the fact that such employee is on leave.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44921.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 44919, the governing board of a unified or high school district may employ persons requiring certification qualifications for the first semester only, and classify such persons as temporary employees, whenever the district expects a reduction in student enrollment during the second semester due to students completing graduation requirements at midyear. The number of persons so employed shall be limited to requirements based on the anticipated reduced enrollment as determined by the governing board. Persons so employed who are continued in employment beyond the first semester shall be deemed probationary employees for the entire school year.

Any such employee shall be reemployed for the following semester or school year to fill any vacant positions in the school district for which the employee is certified. Preference for available positions shall be determined by the governing board using the method prescribed in Sections 44845 and 44846.

For purposes of this section “vacant position” means a position in which the employee is qualified to serve and which is not filled by a permanent or probationary employee. It shall not include a position which would be filled by a permanent or probationary employee except for the fact that such employee is on leave.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44922.

Notwithstanding any other provision, the governing board of a school district or a county superintendent of schools may establish regulations which allow their certificated employees to reduce their workload from full-time to part-time duties.

The regulations shall include, but shall not be limited to, the following, if the employees wish to reduce their workload and maintain retirement benefits pursuant to Section 22713 of this code or Section 20900 of the Government Code:

(a) For employees subject to coverage under the Defined Benefit Program under the State Teachers’ Retirement Plan, the regulations shall include all
 requirements for participation in the reduced workload program pursuant to Section 22713.

(b) For employees subject to coverage under the Public Employees’ Retirement System:

(1) The employee shall have reached the age of 55 years of age prior to reduction in workload.

(2) The employee shall have been employed full time in a position requiring certification for at least 10 years of which the immediately preceding five years were full-time employment.

(3) During the period immediately preceding a request for a reduction in workload, the employee shall have been employed full time in a position requiring certification for a total of at least five years without
 a break in service. For purposes of this subdivision, sabbaticals and other approved leaves of absence shall not constitute a break in service.

(4) The option of part-time employment shall be exercised at the request of the employee and can be revoked only with the mutual consent of the employer and the employee.

(5) The minimum part-time employment shall be the equivalent of one-half of the number of days of service required by the employee’s contract of employment during his or her final year of service in a full-time position.

(6) This option is limited in prekindergarten through grade 12 to certificated employees who do not hold positions with salaries above that of a school principal.

(7) The period of this part-time employment shall include a period of time, as specified in the regulations, which shall be up to and include five years.

(8) The period of part-time employment shall not extend beyond the end of the school year during which the employee reaches his or her 70th birthday.

(c) (1) The employee shall be paid a salary that is the pro rata share of the salary he or she would be earning had he or she not elected to exercise the option of part-time employment but shall retain all other rights and benefits for which he or she makes the payments that would be required if he or she remained in full-time employment.

(2) The employee shall receive health benefits as provided in Section 53201 of the Government Code in the same manner as a full-time employee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 298, Sec. 29.   (AB 1325)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

44923.

In the event a permanent employee of a school district has tenure as a full-time employee of the district, any assignment or employment of such employee in addition to his full-time assignment may be terminated by the governing board of the district at any time.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44924.

Except as provided in Sections 44937 and 44956, any contract or agreement, express or implied, made by any employee to waive the benefits of this chapter or any part thereof is null and void.

Notwithstanding provisions of this or any other section of this code, governing boards of school districts may employ persons in positions requiring certification qualifications on less than a full-time basis.
